Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 3. Litter Control and Recycling.
§ 10.1-1422.01.
Litter Control and Recycling Fund established; use of moneys; purpose of Fund.

All moneys collected from the civil penalties imposed pursuant to §

10.1-1424.3

, from the taxes imposed under §§

58.1-1700

through

58.1-1710

, and by the taxes increased by Chapter 616 of the 1977 Acts of Assembly, shall be paid into the treasury and credited to a special nonreverting fund known as the Litter Control and Recycling Fund, which is hereby established. The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. Any moneys remaining in the Fund shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on such moneys shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. The Director is authorized to release money from the Fund on warrants issued by the Comptroller after receiving and considering the recommendations of the Advisory Board for the purposes enumerated in subsection B.

Moneys from the Fund shall be expended, according to the allocation formula established in subsection C, for the following purposes:

Local litter prevention and recycling grants to localities that meet the criteria established in §

10.1-1422.04

;

Payment to (i) the Department to process the grants authorized by this article and (ii) the actual administrative costs of the Advisory Board. The Director shall assign one person in the Department to serve as a contact for persons interested in the Fund; and

The operation of public information campaigns to discourage the sale and use of expanded polystyrene products and to promote alternatives to expanded polystyrene.

All moneys deposited into the Fund shall be expended pursuant to the following allocation formula:

Ninety percent for grants made to localities pursuant to subdivision B 1;

Up to a maximum of five percent for the actual administrative expenditures authorized pursuant to subdivision B 2; and

Up to a maximum of five percent for the operation of public information campaigns pursuant to subdivision B 3.

History.

1995, c. 417; 2006, c. 6; 2009, c. 409; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 262.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 417, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of §§

10.1-1422.02

and

10.1-1422.03

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 1995, and the other provisions of the first enactment shall become effective on July 1, 1996.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 6, in subdivision B 2, deleted “Statewide and regional” preceding “Litter” and substituted “grants to localities and nonprofit entities” for “educational program grants to persons”; in subdivision B 3, inserted “actual” in clause (ii); and in subsection C, substituted “Ninety” for “Seventy-five” at the beginning of subdivision C 1, substituted “Five percent for litter prevention and recycling” for “Twenty percent for statewide and regional educational program” in subdivision C 2, and substituted “Up to a maximum of 5% for the actual administrative” for “Five percent for the administrative” in subdivision C 3.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 409, in subsection B, deleted former subdivision B 2, which read: Litter prevention and recycling grants to localities and nonprofit entities meeting the criteria established in § 10.1-14422.05;” and made related changes; and in subsection C, substituted “Ninety-five percent” for “Ninety percent” at the beginning of subdivision C 1, deleted former subdivision C 2, which read: “Five percent for litter prevention and recycling grants made pursuant to subdivision B 2 of this section;” and made related changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 262, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, inserted “from the civil penalties imposed pursuant to §

10.1-1424.3

” in the first sentence; added subdivision B 3; in subsection C, substituted “Ninety” for “Ninety-five” in subdivision C 1 and added subdivision C 3; and made stylistic changes.

§ 10.1-1422.02.
Litter Control and Recycling Fund Advisory Board established; duties and responsibilities.

There is hereby created the Litter Control and Recycling Fund Advisory Board. The Advisory Board shall:

Review applications received by the Department for grants from the Fund and make recommendations to the Director for the award of all grants authorized pursuant to §

10.1-1422.01

;

Promote the control, prevention and elimination of litter from the Commonwealth and encourage the recycling of discarded materials to the maximum practical extent; and

Advise the Director on such other litter control and recycling matters as may be requested by the Director or any other state agency.

History.

1995, c. 417.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 417, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of §§

10.1-1422.02

and

10.1-1422.03

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 1995, and the other provisions of the first enactment shall become effective on July 1, 1996.”

§ 10.1-1422.03.
Membership, meetings, and staffing.

The Advisory Board shall consist of five persons appointed by the Governor. Three members shall represent persons paying the taxes which are deposited into the Fund and shall include one member appointed from nominations submitted by recognized industry associations representing retailers; one member appointed from nominations submitted by recognized industry associations representing soft drink distributors; and one member appointed from nominations submitted by recognized industry associations representing beer distributors. One member shall be a local litter or recycling coordinator. One member shall be from the general public.

The initial terms of the members of the Advisory Board shall expire July 1, 1999, and five members shall be appointed or reappointed effective July 1, 1999, for terms as follows: one member shall be appointed for a term of one year; one member shall be appointed for a term of two years; one member shall be appointed for a term of three years; and two members shall be appointed for terms of four years unless found to violate subsection E of this section. Thereafter, all appointments shall be for terms of four years except for appointments to fill vacancies, which shall be for the unexpired term. They shall not receive a per diem, compensation for their service, or travel expenses.

The Advisory Board shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman annually from among its members. The Advisory Board shall meet at least twice annually on such dates and at such times as they determine. Three members of the Advisory Board shall constitute a quorum.

Staff support and actual associated administrative expenses of the Advisory Board shall be provided by the Department from funds allocated from the Fund.

Any member who is absent from three consecutive meetings of the Advisory Board, as certified by the Chairman of the Advisory Board to the Secretary of the Commonwealth, shall be dismissed as a member of the Advisory Board. The replacement of any dismissed member shall be appointed pursuant to subsection A of this section and meet the same membership criteria as the member who has been dismissed. Vacancies occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled for the unexpired term. No person shall be eligible to serve on the Advisory Board for more than two terms.

History.

1995, c. 417; 1998, c. 86; 2006, c. 6; 2014, c. 283.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 417, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of §§

10.1-1422.02

and

10.1-1422.03

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 1995, and the other provisions of the first enactment shall become effective on July 1, 1996.”

The 1998 amendment

rewrote subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 6 inserted “actual” following “Staff support and” in subsection D.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 283, in subsection E added the third and fourth sentences.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Compensation of members. —

Members of the Litter Control and Recycling Fund Advisory Board are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement of expenses under § 2.2-2813. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Stephen H. Martin, Member, Senate of Virginia, 03-032, 2003 Va. AG LEXIS 36 (9/11/03).

§ 10.1-1422.04.
Local litter prevention and recycling grants; eligibility and funding process.

The Director shall award local litter prevention and recycling grants to localities that apply for such grants and meet the eligibility requirements established in the Department’s Guidelines for Litter Prevention and Recycling Grants (DEQ-LPR-2) which were in effect on January 1, 1995, and as may be amended by the Advisory Board after notice and opportunity to be heard by persons interested in grants awarded pursuant to this section. Grants awarded by the Director shall total the amount of Litter Control and Recycling Funds available annually as provided in subdivision B 1 of §

10.1-1422.01

.

History.

1995, c. 417.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 417, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of §§

10.1-1422.02

and

10.1-1422.03

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 1995, and the other provisions of the first enactment shall become effective on July 1, 1996.”

§ 10.1-1422.05.
Repealed by Acts 2009, c. 409, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

10.1-1422.05

, pertaining to litter control and recycling grants, was derived from Acts 1995, c. 417; 2006, c. 6.

§ 10.1-1422.06.
Beneficiation facility as manufacturer for grant purposes.

For the purpose of any state or local economic development incentive grant, including a grant awarded pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 51 (§ 2.2-5100 et seq.) of Title 2.2, a beneficiation facility or recycling center as defined in §

10.1-1414

shall be considered a manufacturer.

History.

2018, c. 615.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 615, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Department of Environmental Quality (the Department) shall provide to the General Assembly, not later than November 1, 2019, an evaluation of Virginia’s solid waste recycling rates and a set of recommendations for improving the reliability of the supply of recycled materials during the next 10 years in order to provide for beneficial use, as defined in §

10.1-1414

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, by industry. The evaluation shall consider incentive-based strategies, including the granting of economic development incentives for the construction of recycling centers and beneficiation facilities that have the potential to increase beneficial use of glass, plastic, metal, and fiber. The evaluation shall also investigate the effect of the operation of mixed-waste material recycling facilities on the quality and quantity of recyclable materials available for beneficial use.”

§ 10.1-1422.1.
Disposal of waste tires.

The Department shall develop and implement a plan for the management and transportation of all waste tires in the Commonwealth.

History.

1989, c. 630; 1993, c. 211.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1989, c. 630, cl. 2 provided that this section would expire on December 31, 1994. However, Acts 1993, c. 211, cl. 2 amends Acts 1989, c. 630, cl. 2, by deleting the expiration date; therefore, this section did not expire on December 31, 1994.

Law Review.

For survey on environmental law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 625 (1989).

For survey on taxation in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 839 (1989).

§ 10.1-1422.2.
Recycling residues; testing.

The Department shall develop and implement a plan for the testing of recycling residues generated in the Commonwealth to determine whether they are nonhazardous.
The costs of conducting such tests shall be borne by the person wishing to dispose of such residues.

History.

1990, c. 781.

§ 10.1-1422.3.
Waste Tire Trust Fund established; use of moneys; purpose of Fund.

All moneys collected pursuant to §

58.1-642

, minus the necessary expenses of the Department of Taxation for the administration of this tire recycling fee as certified by the Tax Commissioner, shall be paid into the treasury and credited to a special nonreverting fund known as the Waste Tire Trust Fund, which is hereby established. Any moneys remaining in the Fund shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on such moneys shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. The Department of Waste Management is authorized and empowered to release moneys from the Fund, on warrants issued by the State Comptroller, for the purposes enumerated in this section, or any regulations adopted thereunder.

Moneys from the Fund shall be expended to:

Pay the costs of implementing the waste tire plan authorized by §

10.1-1422.1

, as well as the costs of any programs created by the Department pursuant to such a plan;

Provide partial reimbursement to persons for the costs of using waste tires or chips or similar materials; and

Pay the costs to remove waste tire piles from property pursuant to §

10.1-1418.4

, to the extent funds are available from the increased revenues generated by the increased tire recycling fee collected beginning July 1, 2003, and ending July 1, 2006, in accordance with §

58.1-641

.

Reimbursements under §

10.1-1422.4

shall not be made until regulations establishing reimbursement procedures have become effective.

History.

1993, c. 211; 2003, c. 101.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 376 B, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §

10.1-1422.3

, Code of Virginia, $1,807,575 in the first year and $1,807,575 in the second year from the Waste Tire Trust Fund, and $250,000 in the first year and $250,000 in the second year from the Hazardous Waste Management Permit Fund within the Department of Environmental Quality shall be used for the costs associated with the Department’s land protection and water programs. Such funds may be used for the purposes set forth in §

10.1-1422.3

, Code of Virginia, at the Director’s discretion and only as available after funding other land protection and water programs.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 101 substituted “tire recycling fee” for “tax” in the first sentence of subsection A; deleted “and” at the end of subdivision B 1; added “and” at the end of subdivision B 2; and added subdivision B 3.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of environmental law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 203 (2004).

§ 10.1-1422.4.
Partial reimbursement for waste tires; eligibility; promulgation of regulations.

The intent of the partial reimbursement of costs under this section is to promote the use of waste tires by enhancing markets for waste tires or chips or similar materials.

Any person who (i) purchases waste tires generated in Virginia and who uses the tires or chips or similar materials for resource recovery or other appropriate uses as established by regulation may apply for partial reimbursement of the cost of purchasing the tires or chips or similar materials or (ii) uses but does not purchase waste tires or chips or similar materials for resource recovery or other appropriate uses as established by regulation may apply for a reimbursement of part of the cost of such use.

To be eligible for the reimbursement (i) the waste tires or chips or similar materials shall be generated in Virginia, and (ii) the user of the waste tires shall be the end user of the waste tires or chips or similar materials. The end user does not have to be located in Virginia.

Reimbursements from the Waste Tire Trust Fund shall be made at least quarterly.

The Board shall promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The regulations shall include, but not be limited to:

Defining the types of uses eligible for partial reimbursement;

Establishing procedures for applying for and processing of reimbursements; and

Establishing the amount of reimbursement.

For the purposes of this section “end user” means (i) for resource recovery, the person who utilizes the heat content or other forms of energy from the incineration or pyrolysis of waste tires, chips or similar materials and (ii) for other eligible uses of waste tires, the last person who uses the tires, chips, or similar materials to make a product with economic value. If the waste tire is processed by more than one person in becoming a product, the end user is the last person to use the tire as a tire, as tire chips, or as similar material. A person who produces tire chips or similar materials and gives or sells them to another person to use is not an end user.

History.

1993, c. 211; 1997, c. 627.

The 1997 amendment,

in subsection D, inserted “at least” preceding “quarterly” in the first sentence and deleted the former second sentence, which read: “Any costs reimbursed under this section shall not exceed seventy-five percent of the previous year’s collections as certified by the Department of Taxation.”

§ 10.1-1422.5.
Repealed by Acts 2001, c. 569.

Cross references.

For present provisions as to used motor oil, see §

10.1-1422.6

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

10.1-1422.5

, pertaining to posting of signs giving information about used motor oil collection centers, was derived from Acts 1993, c. 274; §

10.1-1422.3

.

§ 10.1-1422.6.
Used motor oil, other fluids for automotive engine maintenance, and oil filters; signs; establishment of statewide program.

The Department shall establish a statewide management program for used motor oil, other fluids for automotive engine maintenance, and oil filters. The program shall encourage the environmentally sound management of motor oil, other fluids used for automotive engine maintenance, and oil filters by (i) educating consumers on the environmental benefits of proper management, (ii) publicizing options for proper disposal, and (iii) promoting a management infrastructure that allows for the convenient recycling of these materials by the public. The Department may contract with a qualified public or private entity to implement this program.

The Department shall maintain a statewide list of sites that accept used (i) motor oil, (ii) other fluids used for automotive engine maintenance, and (iii) oil filters from the public. The list shall be updated at least annually. The Department shall create, maintain, and promote a toll-free hotline number and a website where consumers may receive information describing the location of collection sites in their locality to properly dispose of used motor oil, other fluids for automotive engine maintenance, and oil filters.

The Department shall establish an ongoing outreach program to existing and potential collection sites that provides a point of contact for questions and disseminates information on (i) the way to establish a collection site, (ii) technical issues associated with being a collection site, and (iii) the benefits of continued participation in the program.

Any person who sells motor oil, other fluids used for automotive engine maintenance, or oil filters at the retail level and who does not accept the return of used motor oil, other fluids used for automotive engine maintenance, or oil filters shall post a sign that encourages the environmentally sound management of these products and provides a website address and toll-free hotline number where additional information on the locations of used motor oil, other fluids used for automotive engine maintenance, and oil filters collection sites are available. This sign shall be provided by the Department or its designee to all establishments selling motor oil, other fluids used for automotive engine maintenance, or oil filters. In determining the size and manner in which such signs may be affixed or displayed at the retail establishment, the Department shall give consideration to the space available in such retail establishments.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection D shall be subject to a fine of $25.

History.

2001, c. 569; 2008, c. 646.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 646, substituted “other fluids for automotive engine maintenance, and oil filters” for “oil filters, and antifreeze” and “oil filters, or antifreeze” throughout section; in subsections A, deleted “management program” from the end of the first sentence; in subsection B, substituted “a toll-free hotline number and a website” for “an Internet Web site”; in subsection D, substituted “a website address and toll-free hotline number” for “a Web site”; and in subsection E, substituted “$25” for “twenty-five dollars.”

Law Review.

For article, “Environmental Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 601 (2001).

§ 10.1-1423.
Notice to public required.

Pertinent portions of this article shall be posted along the public highways of the Commonwealth, at public highway entrances to the Commonwealth, in all campgrounds and trailer parks, at all entrances to state parks, forest lands and recreational areas, at all public beaches, and at other public places in the Commonwealth where persons are likely to be informed of the existence and content of this article and the penalties for violating its provisions.

History.

1987, c. 234, § 10-277.11; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1424.
Allowing escape of load material; penalty.

No vehicle shall be driven or moved on any highway unless the vehicle is constructed or loaded to prevent any of its load from dropping, sifting, leaking or otherwise escaping therefrom. However, sand or any substance for increasing traction during times of snow and ice may be dropped for the purpose of securing traction, or water or other substances may be sprinkled on a roadway in cleaning or maintaining the roadway by the Commonwealth or local government agency having that responsibility. Any person operating a vehicle from which any glass or objects have fallen or escaped which could constitute an obstruction or damage a vehicle or otherwise endanger travel upon a public highway shall immediately cause the highway to be cleaned of all glass or objects and shall pay any costs therefor. Violation of this section shall constitute a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1986, c. 757, § 10-211; 1987, c. 234, § 10-277.12; 1988, c. 891.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Failure to state a claim under statute. —

Demurrers filed by an employer and an employee were sustained as to an owner’s cause of action for negligence per se based on violations of §§

10.1-1424

and 46.2-1155 because there was no allegation that the owner belonged to the class of persons the statutes were intended to benefit or that the harm suffered was the type of harm the statutes were designed to protect; there was no identification of “the load in the trailer” in the complaint, and there was no statement in the complaint that a “load” shifted from a vehicle onto the roadway or fell from a vehicle onto the roadway. Worsham Kreynus Props., LLC v. Eagle Mobile Transp., 2011 Va. Cir. LEXIS 69 (Richmond June 21, 2011).

§ 10.1-1424.1.
Material containing fully halogenated chloro-fluorocarbons prohibited; penalty.

On and after January 1, 1992, it shall be unlawful for any distributor or manufacturer knowingly to sell or offer for sale, for purposes of resale, any packaging materials that contain fully halogenated chloro-fluorocarbons as a blowing or expansion agent.

Any person convicted of a violation of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1991, c. 101.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 10.1-1424.2.
Products containing trichloroethylene prohibited; penalty.

As of January 1, 2004, it shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly sell or distribute for retail sale in the Commonwealth any product containing trichloroethylene if such product is manufactured for or commonly used as an adhesive for residential hardwood floor installation.

As of January 1, 2006, it shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly sell or distribute for retail sale in the Commonwealth any product manufactured on or after January 1, 2004, for any household or residential purpose if such product contains trichloroethylene. Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

2003, c. 620.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 10.1-1424.3.
Expanded polystyrene food service containers prohibited; civil penalty.

Beginning July 1, 2023, no food vendor that is a restaurant or similar retail food establishment and is part of a chain with 20 or more locations offering for sale substantially the same menu items and doing business under the same name, regardless of the form of ownership of such locations, shall dispense prepared food to a customer in an expanded polystyrene food service container.Beginning July 1, 2025, no food vendor of any type shall dispense prepared food to a customer in an expanded polystyrene food service container.

Any food vendor may request from the locality in which it is located an exemption from the provisions of subsection A. The locality may grant the exemption if the food vendor demonstrates to the satisfaction of the locality that compliance with subsection A would impose an undue economic hardship on the food vendor. For the purposes of this subsection, “undue economic hardship” means a situation in which (i) a food vendor has no reasonable alternative to the expanded polystyrene food service containers in use by that food vendor and (ii) compliance with subsection A would cause significant economic hardship to that food vendor. A locality may so exempt a food vendor for a period of not more than one year from the date of the exemption. A food vendor granted such an exemption may reapply to the locality before the expiration of the exemption, and the locality may grant an additional exemption from the provisions of subsection A not to exceed one year for each such reapplication if the food vendor demonstrates a continuing undue economic hardship at the time of reapplication to the satisfaction of the locality.

Any person who violates any provision of this section, upon such finding by an appropriate circuit court, shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $50 for each day of such violation. Any civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section in a civil action brought by the Attorney General in the name of the Commonwealth shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Litter Control and Recycling Fund. Any civil penalty assessed pursuant to this section in a civil action brought by a locality shall be paid into the treasury of the locality, except where the violator of this section is the locality or its agent, in which case the civil penalty shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Fund.

The Department shall post to its website information on how to comply with this section and how to file a complaint for a violation of this section.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 262.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 10.1-1425.
Preemption of certain local ordinances.

The provisions of this article shall supersede and preempt any local ordinance which attempts to regulate the size or type of any container or package containing food or beverage or which requires a deposit on a disposable container or package.

History.

1987, c. 234, § 10-277.14; 1988, c. 891.